Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.902

Effective date—2008 c 179.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 27, 2008].

[ 2008 c 179 s 307.]